errortag-src/propernoun-sme-morph.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ============ !
! Proper nouns !
! ============ !

! Note: the final non-Sámi consonants:
!          b  d  g  h  m  n  p  t  z
! write as b9 d9 g9 h9 m9 n9 p9 t9 z9

! (t9 in consonant clusters)
! Note: the final vowel e9, used for e-stems that NEVER may have illatives
! in -ii (Mandrake:Mandrakei, iige *Mandrakii)

! j that shall always be j (also in V_C) is written j9, as eg. in Ajja (Aj9ja)

! Table of content
! ----------------
! Aspell lexica
! Continuation lexica
!  Firstpart tag
!  Case etc tags
! Personal names
!  First names
!  Surnames
! Place names
! ----------------

! Aspell lexica
! =============

! This is a lexicon to be used with aspell spell ^checker only.
! It is not in use for the moment. In order to put it into use,
! remove the string "!aSPell: "
! Target is to use as many sublexicons as possible with as many variables
! as possible to create aspell affix file.

!aSPell: LEXICON AspellProp
!aSPell: Aspell LONDON ;
!aSPell: Spelle ACCRA ;
!aSPell: ! MARJA-plc & MARJA use same affixes as GOAHTI
!aSPell: Cbern:Cbern9 BERN ;		! Same^ as BLIND
!aSPell: Duominen:Duomi C-FI-NEN ;
!aSPell: Blondon:Blondon9 LONDON-sur ;		! VUOLAB goes here
!aSPell: ENYSTØ NYSTØ ;
!aSPell: ! PLACE-DIM is same as DIMINC
!aSPell: Ejeakkit:Ejeaggi ALEUHTAT ;

! Continuation lexica
! ===================

! FirstTag

LEXICON FirstTag
@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;

! Names Proper

! Some of the entries point to continuation lexica in the sme-lex.txt
! file, su^ch as GOAHTI. This implies that names have the same inflection as
! ordinary nouns, whi^ch is probably not true. These lexica must thus be re-
! vised as soon as the lexica for names become more accurate.

! Continuation lexica for personal names
! --------------------------------------

! Vowel final names
! - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON ACCRA-ani
 +N+Prop+Ani:%> ACCRADECL ;
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Ani+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Ani+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;
 
LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-obj
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRA-objplc
 +N+Prop+Obj:%> ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-org
 +N+Prop+Org:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;

LEXICON ACCRA-mal
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-malsur
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-fem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
! @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-femsur
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Sur:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-femplc !Names that are both female names and place names
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRADECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-malfem
 +N+Prop+Fem:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 +N+Prop+Mal:%>  ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Fem+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Mal+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ACCRA-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-plc ! Place names
 +N+Prop+Plc:%>  ACCRADECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON ACCRA-LOAN-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRADECL-LOAN ;
 +Use/Sub:%> PLACELASH ; !

LEXICON ACCRA-surplc ! Names that are both surnames and place names
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRADECL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Attr+Use/Sub:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ # ; ! ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRADECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON ACCRA ! Vowel-final names without Gradation and Ill ^change
 +N+Prop:%> ACCRADECL ;

LEXICON ACCRADECL
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 ACCRA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I ;		! correct suffixes
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;
 
LEXICON ACCRADECL-LOAN
! These sublexica are irrelevant for ACCRA, but added
! for the sake of the lexicon MARJA
 ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I; !		! correct suffixes
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL; !
 @U.Cap.Obl@+Use/Sub:@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE; !


LEXICON HAWAII-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> ACCRA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Opt@lažž ATTR ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža PxV ; ! tentative.
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan K ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@lažžan PxC ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@lažža LASJOBL ; ! Under ISSORASSA-


 LEXICON HAWAII-sur
 +N+Prop+Sur:%> ACCRA-DC ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL ;
 @U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-IICASE ;

LEXICON SKOHTERMADII-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> SKOHTERMADIIDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Attr:%>@U.Cap.Opt@jlažž ATTR ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@jlažž JOHTOLAT0 ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Sg+Nom:@U.Cap.Opt@jlažža PxV ; ! tentative.
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@jlažžan K ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A+Ess:@U.Cap.Opt@jlažžan PxC ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Der/laš+A:@U.Cap.Opt@jlažža LASJOBL ;

LEXICON SKOHTERMADIIDECL !This lexicon now fixed according to Pekkas comments, TO
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:i K ; !
 +Sg+Nom:ij K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:id'ja K ;
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:ead'ji K ;
! +Ess:in K ; !SUB
! +Ess:ijn K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:i K ; !
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:ij K ;
 +Sg+Gen:ija K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:eaji K ;
 +Sg+Acc:ija K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:eaji K ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:i Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:i Rreal ; !
! +CmpN/PlG:id9 Rreal ; !SUB
 +CmpN/SgN:ij Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG:ij Rreal ;
   +CmpN/SgG:ija Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgG:eaji Rreal ;
! +CmpN/PlG:ijd9 Rreal ;
+CmpN/PlG:ijajd9 Rreal ;
+CmpN/PlG:ejijd9 Rreal ;
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:i- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:i- Rreal ; !
! +CmpN/PlG:id9- Rreal ; !SUB
 +CmpN/SgN+Use/Sub:ij- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:ij- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:ija- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/SgG+Use/Sub:eaji- Rreal ; !
! +CmpN/PlG:ijd9- Rreal ; !SUB
 +CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:ijajd9- Rreal ; !
 +CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:ejijd9- Rreal ; !
! +Sg+Loc:is K ; !SUB
! +Sg+Loc:in K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Sg+Loc:ijs K ;
 +Sg+Ill:idjij K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/NG:eadjáj K ;
 +Sg+Loc:ijas K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:eajis K ;
! +Sg+Loc:ijn K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Pl+Nom:it K ; !SUB
! +Pl+Nom:ijt K ;
! +Sg+Com:ijn K ;
! +Pl+Gen:ijd9 K ;
! +Pl+Acc:ijd9 K ;
! +Pl+Ill:ijde K ;
! +Pl+Loc:ijn K ;
! +Pl+Loc:ijs K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Pl+Com:ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Nom:ijat K ;
  +Pl+Nom+Use/NG:eajit K ;
 +Sg+Com:ijajn K ;
  +Sg+Com+Use/NG:ejijn K ;
 +Pl+Gen:ijajd9 K ;
  +Pl+Gen+Use/NG:ejijd9 K ;
 +Pl+Acc:ijajd9 K ;
  +Pl+Acc+Use/NG:ejijd9 K ;
 +Pl+Ill:ijajde K ;
  +Pl+Ill+Use/NG:ejijde K ;
 +Pl+Loc:ijajn K ;
  +Pl+Loc+Use/NG:ejijn K ;
 +Pl+Com:ejijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/NG:ijajgujn K ;

LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-obj
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL ;

LEXICON NIKOSIIJA-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> NIKOSIIJADECL ;
:%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON NIKOSIIJADECL !Names with ending -iija, a-illative
ACCRA-DC ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-I ;
@U.Cap.Obl@ ACCRA-OBL ;
!@U.Cap.Obl@+Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>ž@U.Cap.Obl@ PLACE-DIMDECL ; !just to ani, mal, fem

!LEXICON GIEDDI-obj
!! +N+Prop+Obj:%> GIEDDIDECL ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-org
! +N+Prop+Org:%> GIEDDIDECL ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-mal
! +N+Prop+Mal:%>  GIEDDIDECL ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-fem
! +N+Prop+Fem:%>  GIEDDIDECL ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-sur
! +N+Prop+Sur:%> GIEDDIDECL ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-plc ! Place names
! +N+Prop+Plc:%>  GIEDDIDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:X4@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI
! +N+Prop:%> GIEDDIDECL ;

!LEXICON GIEDDIDECL ! Vowel final names with Gradation and Comp. forms
! @U.Cap.Obl@ GIEDDI-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ GIEDDI-DC ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-OBL
! +Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Ess:n K ;
! +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
! +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
! +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
! +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
! +Sg+Loc:X4n K ; !SUB !SOUTH
! +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
! +Sg+Gen:X5 K ;
! +Pl+Gen:X5jd K ;
! +Pl+Acc:X5jd K ;
! +Pl+Ill:X5jde K ;
! +Pl+Loc:X5jn K ;
! +Pl+Com:X5jgujn K ;
! +Sg+Nom:X6 K ;
! +Sg+Nom:X8 K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Nom:X4b K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Gen:X4bu K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Gen:X4b K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Acc:X4bu K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Acc:X4b K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Ill:X4buj K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Loc:X4bus K ;
! +Comp+Sg+Com:X4bujn K ;
! +Comp+Pl+Nom:X4but K ;
! +Comp+Pl+Gen:X4bujd K ;
! +Comp+Pl+Acc:X4bujd K ;
! +Comp+Pl+Ill:X4bujdda K ;
! +Comp+Pl+Loc:X4bujn K ;
! +Comp+Pl+Com:X4bujgujn K ;
! +Comp+Ess:X4bun K ;
! +Superl+Attr:%>X4muss K ;
! +Superl+Sg+Nom:X4muss K ;
! +Superl+CmpN/SgN:X4muss Rreal ;
! +Superl+Sg+Gen:X4musa K ;
! +Superl+Sg+Acc:X4musa K ;
! +Superl+Sg+Ill:X4mussij K ;
! +Superl+Sg+Loc:X4musas K ;
! +Superl+Sg+Com:X4musajn K ;
! +Superl+Pl+Nom:X4musat K ;
! +Superl+Pl+Gen:X4musajd K ;
! +Superl+Pl+Acc:X4musajd K ;
! +Superl+Pl+Ill:X4musaide K ;
! +Superl+Pl+Loc:X4musajn K ;
! +Superl+Pl+Com:X4musajgujn K ;
! +Superl+Ess:X4mussan K ;
! +Der/š+Der/Dimin:%>X8ž PLACE-DIMDECL ;
! DenominalNounsV ;

!LEXICON GIEDDI-DC
! DenominalAdjsV1 ;
! DenominalAdjsV2 ;


LEXICON DAVVISUOLU-plc
 +N+Prop+Plc:%> DAVVISUOLUDECL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsV1 ; !SUB
! @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsV2 ; !SUB
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsV3 ;
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Use/Sub:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ DenominalAdjsV4 ; !
 @U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Y5@U.Cap.Opt@ VUONAT ;


LEXICON DAVVISUOLUDECL !Inanim. Contracted 0-Names - from DAVVISUOLU
 @U.Cap.Obl@ DAVVISUOLU-OBL ;
! @U.Cap.Opt@ DAVVISUOLU-DC ;
